Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 6 Local Improvements

Cross references. —

As to power of all cities and towns to levy and collect taxes for various purposes, see §

15-1-103

.

As to requirements for municipal contracts for public improvements generally, see §

15-1-103

.

As to additions, see §

15-1-415

.

As to interest of officers in contracts, in cities of the first class, see §

15-1-127

.

For authority of city manager in cities operating under the city manager form of government relative to the management of city-owned public utilities, see §

15-4-205

.

As to power of city operating under city manager form of government to vacate streets, see §

15-4-305

.

As to liability of cities operating under the city manager form of government for excavations, obstructions, etc., in streets, see §

15-4-307

.

As to liability for obstructions in streets caused by railroad companies, see §

15-4-309

.

As to removal of snow from streets, alleys and sidewalks in cities operating under the city manager form of government, see §

15-4-311

.

As to power of cities operating under a city manager form of government to install public utilities, see §

15-4-312

.

As to disposal of public utilities by cities operating under a city manager form of government, see §

15-4-313

.

For constitutional provision that no street passenger railway, telegraph, telephone or electric light line shall be constructed within the limits of any municipal organization without the consent of its local authorities, see art. 13, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

As to public works and contractor's bond, see §§

16-6-101

through

16-6-121

.

For provision that all maps, plats, plans or designs necessary to be filed in all city or town offices shall be made and certified by a professional engineer or land surveyor, see § 33-29-139.

As to public utilities generally, see title 37.

As to special benefits to towns, cities and villages with reference to proposed work in connection with drainage districts, see §

41-9-218

.

As to joint operation of drainage districts with municipalities, see §§

41-9-401

through

41-9-403

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

70A Am. Jur. 2d Special or Local Assessments § 1 et seq.